src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@maksev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘aksE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mattev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘attE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@murdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘urdE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@muutev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘uutE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mõistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘õistE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mõskev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘õskE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@mõõtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘õõtE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
mängitav+A:mängitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@möönev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘öönE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@naasev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘aasE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@naerev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘aerE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@naitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘aitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@needev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘eedE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@niitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘iitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nuttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘uttE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@nõudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n˘õudE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@olev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@olev MAGUS  "weight: 5 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ostev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ostE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@paistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘aistE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
pakutav+A:pakutav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@peetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘eetav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@peitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘eitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@peksev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘eksE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pesev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pesev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pettev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ettE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘istE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puskev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘uskE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
puudutav+A:puudutav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@päästev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘äästE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@püüdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘üüdE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@reetev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘eetE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ristitav+A:risʲtitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
rõhutav+A:rõhutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saatev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘aatE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seadev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘eadE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seisev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘eisE2v MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@suutev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘uutE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sõitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘õitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sõudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘õudE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@säästev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘äästE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sööstev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ööstE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@söötev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘öötE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sünnitav+A:sünʲnitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tahtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ahtE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tappev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘appE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@teadev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘eadE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tootev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ootE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tundev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘undE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõstev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õstE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõusev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õusE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@täitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘äitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@uhtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘uhtE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
usutav+A:usutav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@uttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘uttE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@veenev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘eenE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@veetev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘eetE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vestev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘estE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@viitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘iitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õidE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õttE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@väitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘äitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@õitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘õitsE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
õhetav+A:õhetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@õhkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘õhkuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@õitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘õitsev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
õnnestav+A:õnnestav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
õpetatav+A:õpetatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
õpetav+A:õpetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
õpitav+A:õpitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@õppiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘õppiv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@õõtsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘õõtsuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
õõvastav+A:õõvastav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ähkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ähkiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ähvardav+A:ähvardav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
ängistav+A:ängistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
äratav+A:äratav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ärev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ärev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ärkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ärkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ärritatav+A:ärritatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ärritav+A:ärritav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ärrituv+A:ärrituv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ühendav+A:ühendav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
ühinev+A:ühinev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ühtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ühtiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
üldistav+A:ülʲdistav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ületav+A:ületav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ülev+A:ülev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
üllatav+A:üllatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
ümbritsev+A:ümbritsev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
üritav+A:üritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ütlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ütlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
